Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-606
Police officer; bond; arrest powers.

Each police officer of a city of the metropolitan class shall give a bond, shall have the same powers as a county sheriff in arresting all offenders against the laws of the state, and may arrest all offenders against the ordinances of the city with or without a warrant. In discharge of their duties as police officers, they shall be subject to the immediate orders of the chief of police.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 6, p. 497;

C.S.1922, § 3687;

C.S.1929, § 14-606;

R.S.1943, § 14-606;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 219.
July 21, 2022
A policeman is an officer who is required to give an official bond, and premium is payable from general funds of the city. Wheeler v. City of Omaha, 111 Neb. 494, 196 N.W. 894 (1924).

Policeman is required to give bond as a public officer. Rooney v. City of Omaha, 104 Neb. 260, 177 N.W. 166 (1920).